Nebraska, session 109, LB250.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. Section 8-126, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
8-126 (1) Reasonable efforts shall be made for a A majority of the members
of the board of directors of any bank to shall have their primary residences
(a) in this state, (b) or within twenty-five miles of the main office of the
bank, (c) in . Reasonable efforts shall be made to acquire members of such
board of directors from the county in which the main office of such bank is
located, or (d) in and from counties in which branches of such bank are
located.
(2) Directors of banks shall be persons of good moral character, known
integrity, business experience, and responsibility. No person shall act as a
member of the board of directors of any bank until such bank applies for and
obtains approval from the department.
(3) If the department, upon investigation, determines that any director of
a bank is conducting the business of the bank in an unsafe or unauthorized
manner or is endangering the interests of the stockholders or depositors, the
Director of Banking and Finance has the authority, following notice and
opportunity for hearing, to revoke such approval to act as a member of the
board of directors.
(4) The Director of Banking and Finance may adopt and promulgate rules and
regulations and prescribe forms to carry out this section.
Sec. 2. Original section 8-126, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
repealed.
-1-